Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201114-3,113
Intersections, certain lands; improvement
by city; priority on use of funds; street improvement districts.

(1) The city
is authorized to improve intersections, spaces opposite alleys, and spaces
opposite property not subject to special assessment, with the like material
in the manner provided in sections 14-384 to 14-3,127 for improving streets
whenever a street, highway, boulevard, main thoroughfare, controlled-access
facility, major traffic street, or alley is ordered to be improved at the
time of improving such street and in such event is authorized to include in
such improvement of such intersection and spaces the construction, replacement,
or repair of sidewalks therein and, except as may be otherwise provided, pay
for all such improvements from funds provided for the purpose of improving
intersections if (a) the first priority in the expenditure
of funds for such purposes is given
to improvements within street improvement districts and (b) the city maintains, in a separate fund,
not less than twenty-five thousand dollars to be expended solely for the purpose
of improving intersections.

(2) Such sidewalk construction,
replacement, or repair may be included either in the contract for curbings
at an intersection or in the contract for paving the same.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 30, p. 206;

Laws 1963, c. 47, § 1, p. 223;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 1.
January 1, 2012